Nevada, session 83, AB98.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 236 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Governor shall annually proclaim April 10 to be
“Dolores Huerta Day” in the State of Nevada.
2. The proclamation must encourage all public schools and
educational institutions in this State to recognize and educate
students regarding the life and accomplishments of Dolores
Huerta and her contributions to the United States.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)